District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0555.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Deadline Accountability Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 204 of the Freedom of Information Act of 1976, effective March 29,
1977 (D.C. 1-96; D.C. Official Code § 2-534) is amended by adding a new subsection (f) to read
as follows:
“(f)(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, deliberative process privilege may
not be claimed as an exemption from disclosure of any document required by law to be published
or transmitted to the Council by a date certain, if said date has passed without publication or
transmittal to the Council of a final version.
“(2) For a document required to be produced by a date certain, the Mayor may
transmit a resolution requesting a deadline extension to the Council for a 30-day period of
review. The transmitted resolution shall include the reason for the extension and the
consequences if the extension is not approved. If the Council has not approved or disapproved


the resolution within the 30-day review period, the resolution shall be deemed disapproved.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.